Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB626.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2307.1. Code compliance notice following sheriff's sale. (a) Notice .-- (1) The department shall prepare and provide a code compliance notice for each county in this Commonwealth.(2) The notice shall be provided to each county sheriff within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection.(3) The notice may be provided electronically to a sheriff's office if the department can confirm receipt of the notice.(4) The notice shall include, but not be limited to, the 123456789101112131415161718 following:(i) A list of municipalities in the county with the following information for each municipality:(A) General contact information for the municipality.(B) Whether the municipality has elected to enforce the Uniform Construction Code under the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, and:(I) For municipalities that have elected to enforce the Uniform Construction Code, the name and contact information for the building code official and whether the municipality has enacted amendments to the Uniform Construction Code.(II) For municipalities that have elected not to enforce the Uniform Construction Code, the contact information for the appropriate Uniform Construction Code staff at the department . (ii) Plain language information about compliance with the Uniform Construction Code and the permits that may be required before construction on a property can commence. The information under this subparagraph shall include a statement that the purchaser should contact the building code official or the department, whichever is applicable for the municipality where the property is located, to obtain additional information about the requirements of the Uniform Construction Code.(iii) Plain language information explaining that municipalities may have enacted municipal zoning ordinances or other municipal ordinances, which may 20250HB0626PN0637 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 require a permit, a variance or other compliance measures before construction on a property may commence. The information under this subparagraph shall include a statement that the purchaser should contact the municipality where the property is located to obtain additional information about how to comply with municipal requirements.(iv) Other relevant information that the department deems appropriate to provide the purchaser of a property at a sheriff's sale.(b) Duty of sheriff.--A sheriff shall provide the code compliance notice required under subsection (a) to a purchaser of a property at a sheriff's sale. The code compliance notice shall be posted on the sheriff's publicly accessible Internet website and in the location where other information about sheriff's sales is displayed, and shall be made available to prospective purchasers attending the sheriff's sale.(c) Updates.--(1) The department shall update the code compliance notice under subsection (a) on an annual basis. (2) The department shall provide the updated notice to each county sheriff prior to December 31 each year, beginning the year after the notice required by subsection (a) is provided for the first time.(3) The department may provide the updated notice electronically to a sheriff's office if the department confirms receipt of the updated notice.(d) Application.--The provisions of this section shall apply to properties purchased or sold in accordance with the provisions of the act of May 16, 1923 (P.L.207, No.153), 20250HB0626PN0637 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 referred to as the Municipal Claim and Tax Lien Law, and the act of July 7, 1947 (P.L.1368, No.542), known as the Real Estate Tax Sale Law.(e) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "department" means the Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of 68 Pa.C.S. § 2307.1(b) shall take effect in 151 days.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB0626PN0637 - 4 - 123456789101112